Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1591YC (3) 91 ss/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 124E.8, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The department shall issue a request for proposals 3 accept applications to select and license by April 1, 2018, 4 up to five ten medical cannabidiol dispensaries to dispense 5 medical cannabidiol within this state consistent with the 6 provisions of this chapter . The department shall license new 7 medical cannabidiol dispensaries or relicense the existing 8 medical cannabidiol dispensaries by December 1 of each year. 9 A licensee may hold a maximum of three medical cannabidiol 10 dispensary licenses. 11 Sec. 2. Section 124E.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 12 by striking the subsection. 13